pl: Uwzględnienie zapłonu w kolumnie kierownicy: Z miejscem na wkładkę stacyjki; Z miejscem na stacyjkę; Z blokadą kierownicy; Bez miejsca na wkładkę stacyjki; Bez blokady kierownicy; Inne
de: Vorrichtung für das Zündschloss der Lenksäule: Mit Vorrichtung für Zündschließzylinder; Mit Vorrichtung für Zündschalter; Mit Lenkradschloss; Ohne Vorrichtung für Zündschloss; Ohne Lenkradschloss; Sonstige
th: ช่องสำหรับติดตั้งระบบสตาร์ทเครื่องยนต์ที่คอพวงมาลัย: พร้อมกระบอกกุญแจสตาร์ท; พร้อมสวิตช์กุญแจ; พร้อมล็อกพวงมาลัย; ไม่มีกระบอกกุญแจสตาร์ท; ไม่มีล็อกพวงมาลัย; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 转向柱点火装置: 带点火锁芯槽; 带点火开关槽; 带转向锁; 无点火锁槽; 无转向锁; 其他
sl-SI: Nastavek za vžig na krmilnem stebru: S predpripravo za cilinder ključavnice za vžig; S predpripravo za stikalo za vžig; Z zaklepom volana; Brez predpriprave za ključavnico za vžig; Brez zaklepa volana; Drugo
hu: Kormányoszlop gyújtáskapcsolójának felszereltsége: Gyújtáskapcsoló-henger kialakítással; Gyújtáskapcsoló kialakítással; Kormányzárral; Gyújtáskapcsoló kialakítás nélkül; Kormányzár nélkül; Egyéb
bg-BG: Подготовка за контактния ключ в кормилната колона: С предвидено място за патронник за запалване; С предвидено място за ключ за запалване; Със заключване на волана; Без предвидено място за патронник за запалване; Без заключване на волана; Друго
tr: Direksiyon ve ateşleme sistemi: Kontak kilidi silindiri yuvalı; Kontak anahtarı yuvalı; Direksiyon kilitli; Kontak kilidi yuvasız; Direksiyon kilitsiz; Diğer
es: Disposición de encendido en la columna de dirección: Con provisión para cilindro de cerradura de encendido; Con provisión para interruptor de encendido; Con bloqueo de dirección; Sin provisión para cerradura de encendido; Sin bloqueo de dirección; Otro
cs: Zápalování na sloupku řízení: S přípravou pro cylindrickou vložku zapalování; S přípravou pro spínač zapalování; Se zámkem řízení; Bez přípravy pro zámek zapalování; Bez zámku řízení; Jiné
fr: Prédisposition d’allumage de la colonne de direction: Avec emplacement pour barillet d’allumage; Avec emplacement pour contacteur d’allumage; Avec antivol de direction; Sans emplacement pour verrou d’allumage; Sans antivol de direction; Autre
vi: Cung cấp hệ thống đánh lửa cột lái: Có chuẩn bị cho ổ khóa điện; Có chuẩn bị cho công tắc đánh lửa; Có khóa vô lăng; Không có chuẩn bị cho ổ khóa điện; Không có khóa vô lăng; Khác
nl: Stuurkolom contactslotvoorziening: Met voorziening voor contactslotcilinder; Met voorziening voor contactschakelaar; Met stuurslot; Zonder voorziening voor contactslot; Zonder stuurslot; Overige
pt-PT: Provisionamento de ignição na coluna de direção: Com disposição para canhão de ignição; Com disposição para interruptor de ignição; Com bloqueio de direção; Sem disposição para canhão de ignição; Sem bloqueio de direção; Outro
pt-BR: Coluna de direção provisão de ignição: Com suporte para cilindro de ignição; Com suporte para interruptor de ignição; Com trava de direção; Sem suporte para trava de ignição; Sem trava de direção; Outro
ru: Наличие поддержки замка зажигания в рулевой колонке: С местом под личинку замка зажигания; С местом под выключатель зажигания; С блокировкой руля; Без места под замок зажигания; Без блокировки руля; Другое
ja: ステアリングコラム点火装置対応: イグニッションロックシリンダー仕様; イグニッションスイッチ仕様; ステアリングロック付き; イグニッションロック仕様なし; ステアリングロックなし; その他
sv: Tändningsanordning för rattstång: Med plats för tändningslås; Med plats för tändkontakt; Med rattlås; Utan plats för tändningslås; Utan rattlås; Övrigt
en: Steering column ignition provision: With ignition lock cylinder provision; With ignition switch provision; With steering lock; Without ignition lock provision; Without steering lock; Other
it: Predisposizione per l’accensione sul piantone dello sterzo: Con predisposizione cilindro serratura accensione; Con predisposizione interruttore accensione; Con bloccasterzo; Senza predisposizione serratura accensione; Senza bloccasterzo; Altro
hr-HR: Osiguranje paljenja stupaca upravljača: S pripremom za cilindar brave paljenja; S pripremom za prekidač paljenja; S bravom upravljača; Bez pripreme za bravu paljenja; Bez brave upravljača; Ostalo
sk-SK: Príprava pre zapaľovanie na stĺpiku riadenia: S prípravou na vložku spínacej skrinky; S prípravou na spínaciu skrinku; So zámkom riadenia; Bez prípravy na zámok zapaľovania; Bez zámku riadenia; Iné
el: Δυνατότητα τοποθέτησης διακόπτη ανάφλεξης στην κολόνα τιμονιού: Με υποδοχή για κλειδαριά ανάφλεξης; Με υποδοχή για διακόπτη ανάφλεξης; Με κλείδωμα τιμονιού; Χωρίς υποδοχή για κλειδαριά ανάφλεξης; Χωρίς κλείδωμα τιμονιού; Άλλο
da: Tændingsforberedelse for ratstamme: Forberedt til tændingslås; Forberedt til tændingskontakt; Med ratlås; Ikke forberedt til tændingslås; Uden ratlås; Andet
nb: Tilrettelegging for tenningslås på rattstammen: Klargjort for tenningslåssylinder; Klargjort for tenningsbryter; Med rattlås; Ikke klargjort for tenningslås; Uten rattlås; Annet
fi: Ohjauspylvään sytytysjärjestelmä: Virtalukon sylinterin paikka; Virtalukon paikka; Ohjauslukolla; Ilman virtalukon paikkaa; Ilman ohjauslukkoa; Muu
lt-LT: Vairo kolonėlės uždegimo sistemos pritaikymas: Su uždegimo spynelės cilindro vieta; Su uždegimo jungiklio vieta; Su vairo užraktu; Be uždegimo spynelės vietos; Be vairo užrakto; Kita
zh-TW: 轉向柱點火裝置配備: 附點火鎖芯預留孔; 附點火開關預留孔; 附方向盤鎖; 無點火鎖芯預留孔; 無方向盤鎖; 其他
ro-RO: Prevedere pentru contact de pornire pe coloana de direcție: Cu prevedere pentru cilindru de contact; Cu prevedere pentru comutator de contact; Cu blocator de volan; Fără prevedere pentru cilindru de contact; Fără blocator de volan; Altele
ko: 스티어링 칼럼 점화 장치 포함 여부: 이그니션 락 실린더 프로비전 포함; 이그니션 스위치 프로비전 포함; 스티어링 락 포함; 이그니션 락 프로비전 없음; 스티어링 락 없음; 기타